Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2137
Property; exempt from taxation; payments in lieu of taxes.

The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and shall be exempt from all taxes. Whenever such authority shall purchase or acquire real property pursuant to sections 18-2101 to 18-2144, the authority shall annually, so long as it shall continue to own such property, pay out of its revenue to the State of Nebraska, county, city, township, school district or other taxing subdivision in which such real property is located, in lieu of taxes, a sum equal to the amount which such state, county, city, township, school district or other taxing subdivision received from taxation from such real property during the year immediately preceding the purchase or acquisition of such real property by the authority. The county board of equalization may, in any year subsequent to the purchase or acquisition of such property by the authority, determine the amount that said authority shall pay out of its revenue to the State of Nebraska and its several governmental subdivisions in lieu of taxes, which sum shall be as justice and equity may require, notwithstanding the amount which the state and its governmental subdivisions may have received from taxation during the year immediately preceding the purchase or acquisition of such property; Provided, that with respect to any property in a redevelopment project, the tax exemption provided herein shall terminate when the authority sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of such property to a redeveloper for redevelopment. The members of the authority shall not incur any personal liability by reason of the making of such payments.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 16(2), p. 818;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1637;

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 14, p. 260;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2637.